Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 4
SECRETARY OF STATE

7-90-401. Powers.

The secretary of state has all powers reasonably necessary to perform the duties required by law.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part added, p. 971, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2295, § 209, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1484, § 222, effective July 1.

7-90-402. Interrogatories by secretary of state.

The secretary of state may propound to any domestic entity that has a constituent filed document filed in the records of the secretary of state, to any foreign entity that is authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state, and to any manager thereof, such interrogatories as may be reasonably necessary and proper to enable the secretary of state to ascertain whether the entity has complied with all the provisions of the organic statutes. The interrogatories shall be answered within thirty days after the mailing thereof or within such additional time as fixed by the secretary of state, and the answers thereto shall be full and complete and shall be made in writing. If the interrogatories are directed to an individual, they shall be answered by the individual, and if directed to an entity, they shall be answered by a manager of the entity or by any other person authorized to answer the interrogatories as its agent. The secretary of state need not file any document to which such interrogatories relate until the interrogatories are answered as provided in this section, and not then if the answers thereto disclose that the document is not in conformity with the provisions of the organic statutes. The secretary of state shall certify to the attorney general, for such action as the attorney general may deem appropriate, all interrogatories and answers thereto that disclose a violation of any of the provisions of the organic statutes.

Interrogatories propounded by the secretary of state and the answers thereto shall not be open to public inspection, nor shall the secretary of state disclose any facts or information obtained therefrom, except insofar as the official duty of the secretary of state may require the same to be made public or in the event such interrogatories or the answers thereto are required for evidence in any criminal proceedings or in any other action by this state.

Each entity that fails or refuses to answer truthfully and fully, within the time prescribed by subsection (1) of this section, interrogatories propounded to the entity by the secretary of state in accordance with the provisions of said subsection (1) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars.

Each manager of an entity who fails or refuses to answer truthfully and fully, within the time prescribed by subsection (1) of this section, interrogatories propounded to the manager by the secretary of state in accordance with the provisions of said subsection (1) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars.

The attorney general may enforce this section in an action brought in the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the entity's principal office or the street address of its registered agent is located or, if the entity has no principal office in this state and no registered agent, in the district court in and for the city and county of Denver.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 872, § 53, effective July 1.

7-90-403. Notices by the secretary of state.

The secretary of state may give notice, in such manner as the secretary of state may determine, to any person about any matter arising under or with respect to this title, including notice regarding:

The due date of a periodic report;

The existence of grounds for delinquency;

The pendency of dissolution upon expiration of period of duration;

The dissolution upon expiration of period of duration;

The due date of a trade name renewal; and

The due date of a trademark renewal.

The secretary of state may use a phase-in period or any other method to mitigate hardship on the reporting entity caused by electronic notification and may provide exceptions from such electronic notification where hardship or other good cause is shown.

This subsection (1) does not affect a requirement that the secretary of state give notice under another provision of law.

Neither the determination of the secretary of state to give, or not to give, any notice under the authority of subsection (1) of this section nor the failure of any person to receive any notice so given affects any obligation under or requirement of any provision of this title or excuses any noncompliance by any person of any obligation under or requirement of any provision of this title.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1403), ch. 404, p. 1996, § 14, effective August 11.

7-90-404. Distribution of information - student loan repayment and loan forgiveness programs.

The secretary of state shall annually disseminate for the benefit of employees of nonprofit public service organizations, as defined in 34 CFR 685.219, informational materials relating to federal student loan repayment programs and student loan forgiveness programs, including updated materials, received from the department of personnel pursuant to section 24-5-102. The secretary of state may disseminate the informational materials by posting the materials on the secretary of state's website.

The secretary of state shall encourage each nonprofit public service organization to annually distribute the informational materials, including any updated materials, to each employee of the nonprofit public service organization and to include the informational materials as part of the nonprofit public service organization's new employee orientation process.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-057), ch. 35, p. 115, § 11, effective August 2.